src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-I-oowatoo_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - oowatoo - ok : # -m inanimate transitive verb, eat AEW NA1
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitaowatoohpa
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitaowatoohpa
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: aowatoomayi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitaowatoohpinnaana
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: aowatoo'pa
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitaowatoohpoaawa
     
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitaaksowatoohpa
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitaaksowatoohpa
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: aaksowatoomayi
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitaaksowatoohpinnaana
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: aaksowatoo'pa
     PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitaaksowatoohpoaawa
     
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitsowatoohpa
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitsowatoohpa
     PS/ii+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: iiwatoomayi
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitsowatoohpinnaana
     PS/ii+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: iiwatoo'pa
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitsowatoohpoaawa
     
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaataowatoohpa
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaataowatoohpa
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+3Pl+PRO+D3Sg: maataowatoomaiksayi
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaataowatoohpinnaana
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maataowatoo'pa
     PS/maat+PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaataowatoohpoaawa
     
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaataaksowatoohpa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaataaksowatoohpa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO: maataaksowatoomaatsayi
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaataaksowatoohpinnaana
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maataaksowatoo'pa
     PS/maat+PS/yaak+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaataaksowatoohpoaawa
     
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaatsowatoohpa
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaatsowatoohpa
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO: maatsowatoomaatsayi
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaatsowatoohpinnaana
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maatsowatoo'pa
     PS/maat+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaatsowatoohpoaawa
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Sg+0SgO: nitaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Sg+0SgO: kitaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Sg+0SgO: otaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Sg+0SgO: aowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Sg+0PlO: nitaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Sg+0PlO: kitaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Sg+0PlO: otaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Sg+0PlO: aowatoohsi
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Pl+0SgO: nitaowatoohsinnaani
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+21Pl+0SgO: aowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Pl+0SgO: kitaowatoohsoaayi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Pl+0SgO: otaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Pl+0SgO: aowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Pl+0PlO: nitaowatoohsinnaani
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+21Pl+0PlO: aowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Pl+0PlO: kitaowatoohsoaayi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Pl+0PlO: otaowatoohsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Pl+0PlO: aowatoohsi
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Sg+0SgO: aowatoommiiniki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Sg+0SgO: aowatoommiiniki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Sg+0SgO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Sg+0SgO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Sg+0PlO: aowatoommiiniki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Sg+0PlO: aowatoommiiniki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Sg+0PlO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Sg+0PlO: aowatoisi
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Pl+0SgO: aowatoommiinnainiki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+21Pl+0SgO: aowatoommiinoainiki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Pl+0SgO: aowatoi'ki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Pl+0SgO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Pl+0SgO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Pl+0PlO: aowatoommiinnainiki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+21Pl+0PlO: aowatoommiinoainiki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Pl+0PlO: aowatoi'ki
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Pl+0PlO: aowatoisi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Pl+0PlO: aowatoisi
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Sg+0SgO: nitaowatoohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Sg+0SgO: kitaowatoohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Sg+0SgO: aowatoomahtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Sg+0SgO: aowatoomahtopiyini
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Sg+0PlO: nitaowatoohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Sg+0PlO: kitaowatoohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Sg+0PlO: aowatoomahtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Sg+0PlO: aowatoomahtopiyini
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Pl+0SgO: nitaowatoohpinnaanopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+21Pl+0SgO: aowatoo'pohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Pl+0SgO: kitaowatoomahtopiyi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Pl+0SgO: aowatoomahtopiyi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Pl+0SgO: aowatoomahtopiyini
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Pl+0PlO: nitaowatoohpinnaanopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+21Pl+0PlO: aowatoo'pohtopi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Pl+0PlO: kitaowatoomahtopiyi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Pl+0PlO: aowatoomahtopiyi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Pl+0PlO: aowatoomahtopiyini
     
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+2Sg+0SgO: aowatoota
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+2Pl+0SgO: aowatooka
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+2Sg+0PlO: aowatootsi
     PS/a+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+2Pl+0PlO: aowatooki
